Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-371
Capital stock association; organization; prerequisites.

No capital stock association may be organized unless, prior to the filing of its articles of incorporation and bylaws, such amounts of its capital stock set forth in department rules and regulations or as the director shall deem adequate, shall have been subscribed for and paid into the association. Every stock association shall also obtain insurance of accounts from an agency of the federal government prior to commencing operation.

Laws 1981, LB 500, § 16.